pl: Typ montażu bagażnika rowerowego: Mocowany do osi; Na zacisk; Mocowanie wielopunktowe (combo); Mocowany do korony widelca; Mocowany do otworów w ramie; Zintegrowany z ramą; Mocowany na szybkozamykacz; Mocowany do sztycy; Mocowany do górnych rurek tylnego trójkąta; Na paski; Uniwersalny na paski; Inne
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης σχάρας ποδηλάτου: Τοποθέτηση στον άξονα; Τοποθέτηση με σφιγκτήρα; Συνδυαστική τοποθέτηση; Τοποθέτηση στη γέφυρα πιρουνιού; Τοποθέτηση σε υποδοχές σκελετού; Ενσωματωμένη στον σκελετό; Τοποθέτηση σε άξονα quick-release; Τοποθέτηση στο παλουκόσελο; Τοποθέτηση στα ψαλίδια; Τοποθέτηση με ιμάντες; Τοποθέτηση με ιμάντες γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
hr-HR: Tip montaže nosača za bicikl: Montaža na osovinu; Na stezaljku; Kombinirana montaža; Montaža na krunu vilice; Montaža na ušice okvira; Integrirano u okvir; Montaža na zatezač osovine (QR); Montaža na cijev sjedala; Montaža na cijevi stražnje vilice (seatstay); Na remen; Univerzalna na remen; Ostalo
ja: 自転車ラック取り付けタイプ: アクスルマウント; クランプオン; コンボマウント; フォーククラウンマウント; フレームアイレットマウント; フレーム一体型; クイックリリーススキュワーマウント; シートポストマウント; シートステーマウント; ストラップオン; ユニバーサルストラップオン; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem de suporte para bicicleta: Montagem no eixo; Fixação com grampo; Montagem combinada; Montagem na coroa do garfo; Montagem no ilhó do quadro; Integrada no quadro; Montagem na haste de libertação rápida; Montagem no espigão de selim; Montagem nas escoras superiores; Fixação com correias; Fixação universal com correias; Outros
en: Bicycle rack mounting type: Axle-mounted; Clamp-on; Combo mount; Fork crown-mounted; Frame eyelet-mounted; Frame-integrated; Quick-release skewer-mounted; Seatpost-mounted; Seatstay-mounted; Strap-on; Universal strap-on; Other
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia stojanu na bicykel: Montáž na osku; Montáž pomocou svoriek; Kombinovaná montáž; Montáž na korunku vidlice; Montáž na oká rámu; Integrované do rámu; Montáž na rýchloupinák; Montáž na sedlovku; Montáž na sedlové vzpery; Montáž pomocou popruhov; Univerzálna montáž na popruhy; Iná
cs: Typ upevnění na kolo: Montáž na osu; Montáž na objímku; Kombinovaná montáž; Montáž na korunku vidlice; Montáž na očka rámu; Integrovaný do rámu; Montáž na rychloupínák; Montáž na sedlovku; Montáž na zadní stavbu; Připevnění popruhy; Univerzální připevnění popruhy; Jiné
nl: Fiets bagagedrager montagetype: Asbevestiging; Klembevestiging; Combobevestiging; Vorkkroonbevestiging; Frameoogbevestiging; In frame geïntegreerd; Snelspannerbevestiging; Zadelpenbevestiging; Achtervorkbevestiging; Riembevestiging; Universele riembevestiging; Anders
vi: Loại giá đỡ xe đạp: Gắn trục; Gắn bằng kẹp; Gắn kết hợp; Gắn chạc ba; Gắn lỗ bắt ốc trên khung; Tích hợp trên khung; Gắn trục tháo lắp nhanh; Gắn cọc yên; Gắn gióng buông; Gắn bằng dây đai; Gắn bằng dây đai vạn năng; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de montare pentru suportul de biciclete: Montare pe ax; Montare cu clemă; Montare combinată; Montare pe coroana furcii; Montare pe urechile cadrului; Integrat în cadru; Montare cu quick-release; Montare pe tija de șa; Montare pe seatstay; Montare cu chingi; Montare universală cu chingi; Altele
bg-BG: Тип на монтаж на багажника за велосипед: За ос; Със скоба; Комбиниран монтаж; За короната на вилката; За ушите на рамката; Интегриран в рамката; За автомат за бързо освобождаване; За колчето на седалката; За горните тръби на задния триъгълник; С ремъци; Универсален с ремъци; Други
ru: Тип крепления велосипедного багажника: На ось; На хомутах; Комбинированное крепление; На корону вилки; На бонки рамы; Интегрированное в раму; На эксцентрик; На подседельный штырь; На верхние перья; На ремнях; Универсальное на ремнях; Другое
zh-CN: 自行车货架安装类型: 轴装式; 夹钳式; 组合安装式; 前叉叉肩安装式; 车架孔眼安装式; 车架一体式; 快拆杆安装式; 座管安装式; 后上叉安装式; 绑带式; 通用绑带式; 其他
tr: Bisiklet bagaj taşıyıcısı montaj tipi: Aksa monte; Kelepçeli; Karma montaj; Maşa tacına monte; Kadro deliğine monte; Kadroya entegre; Mandallı bağlantı; Sele borusuna monte; Sele çatalına monte; Kayışlı; Evrensel kayışlı; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do suporte para bicicleta: Montado no eixo; Abraçadeira; Montagem combinada; Montado na coroa do garfo; Montado no olhal do quadro; Integrado ao quadro; Montado com blocagem de engate rápido; Montado no canote; Montado no seat stay; Com alça; Com alça universal; Outro
lt-LT: Dviračio stovo tvirtinimo tipas: Tvirtinama prie ašies; Tvirtinama spaustukais; Kombinuoto tvirtinimo; Tvirtinama prie šakės karūnos; Tvirtinama prie rėmo ąselių; Integruota į rėmą; Tvirtinama greitveržle; Tvirtinama ant balnelio stovo; Tvirtinama ant galinės šakės; Tvirtinama dirželiais; Universali tvirtinama dirželiais; Kita
zh-TW: 自行車架安裝類型: 車軸安裝; 夾持式; 組合式安裝; 前叉肩蓋安裝; 車架鎖孔安裝; 車架整合式; 快拆桿安裝; 座管安裝; 後上叉安裝; 綁帶式; 通用綁帶式; 其他
de: Montageart des Fahrradträgers: An der Achse montiert; Klemmbefestigung; Kombi-Halterung; An der Gabelkrone montiert; An Rahmenösen montiert; Im Rahmen integriert; Am Schnellspanner montiert; An der Sattelstütze montiert; An den Sitzstreben montiert; Riemenbefestigung; Universelle Riemenbefestigung; Sonstige
sv: Monteringstyp för cykelstativ: Axelmonterad; Klämfäste; Kombifäste; Gaffelkronemonterad; Ramöglemonterad; Ramintegrerad; Snabbkopplingsmonterad; Sadelstolpsmonterad; Sadelrörsmonterad; Remfäste; Universellt remfäste; Övrigt
fr: Type de fixation du porte-vélo: Montage sur axe; À collier; Montage combiné; Montage sur té de fourche; Montage sur œillets de cadre; Intégré au cadre; Montage sur blocage rapide; Montage sur tige de selle; Montage sur haubans; À sangle; À sangle universelle; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve za kolo: Pritrditev na os; Sponka; Kombinirana pritrditev; Pritrditev na krono vilic; Pritrditev na ušesca okvirja; Vgrajeno v okvir; Pritrditev na hitri zapenjalec; Pritrditev na oporo sedeža; Pritrditev na zadnje vilice; Pritrditev s paščki; Univerzalna pritrditev s paščki; Drugo
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งแร็คจักรยาน: ติดตั้งที่แกนล้อ; หนีบ; ติดตั้งแบบคอมโบ; ติดตั้งที่บ่าโช้ค; ติดตั้งที่รูยึดเฟรม; รวมกับเฟรม; ติดตั้งที่แกนปลดเร็ว; ติดตั้งที่หลักอาน; ติดตั้งที่ซีทสเตย์; รัดสาย; รัดสายแบบอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
da: Monteringstype for cykelholder: Akselmonteret; Klemme; Kombibeslag; Monteret på forgaffelkrone; Monteret i steløjer; Stelintegreret; Monteret med quick-release; Sadelpindsmonteret; Sadelstræbermonteret; Remmonteret; Universel remmontering; Andet
fi: Polkupyörätelineen kiinnitystyyppi: Akseliin kiinnitettävä; Puristinkiinnitteinen; Yhdistelmäkiinnitys; Etuhaarukan kruunuun kiinnitettävä; Rungon korvakkeisiin kiinnitettävä; Runkoon integroitu; Pikalinkkuun kiinnitettävä; Satulaputkeen kiinnitettävä; Takahaarukan yläputkeen kiinnitettävä; Hihnakiinnitteinen; Yleismallinen hihnakiinnitys; Muu
it: Tipo di montaggio per bicicletta: A perno; A morsetto; Attacco combinato; A testa di forcella; Ad anello sul telaio; Integrato nel telaio; A sgancio rapido; A reggisella; A foderi verticali; A cinghia; A cinghia universale; Altro
es: Tipo de montaje del portabicicletas: Montado en el eje; Con abrazadera; Montaje combinado; Montado en la corona de la horquilla; Montado en ojetes del cuadro; Integrado en el cuadro; Montado en cierre rápido; Montado en la tija del sillín; Montado en los tirantes; Con correas; Con correas universales; Otro
hu: Kerékpárállvány rögzítési típusa: Tengelyre szerelhető; Bilincses; Kombinált rögzítés; Villanyakra szerelhető; Vázszembe szerelhető; Vázba integrált; Gyorszáras; Nyeregcsőre szerelhető; Támvillára szerelhető; Pántos; Univerzális pántos; Egyéb
nb: Monteringstype for sykkelsnelle: Akselmontert; Klemme; Kombifeste; Gaffelkrone-montert; Rammeøye-montert; Rammeintegrert; Hurtigkobling-montert; Setepinne-montert; Setestag-montert; Stroppemontert; Universell stroppemontert; Annet
ko: 자전거 랙 장착 방식: 액슬 장착형; 클램프온; 콤보 마운트; 포크 크라운 장착형; 프레임 아일릿 장착형; 프레임 통합형; 퀵릴리스 스큐어 장착형; 시트포스트 장착형; 시트스테이 장착형; 스트랩온; 범용 스트랩온; 기타